North Carolina, session 2025, HB26.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
PART I. TOWN OF MADISON SATELLITE ANNEXATION CAP REMOVAL
SECTION 1. G.S. 160A-58.1(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A noncontiguous area proposed for annexation must meet all of the following
standards:
…
(5) The area within the proposed satellite corporate limits, when added to the area
within all other satellite corporate limits, may not exceed ten percent (10%)
of the area within the primary corporate limits of the annexing city.
This subdivision does not apply to the Cities of Archdale, Asheboro,
Belmont, Claremont, Concord, Conover, Durham, Elizabeth City, Gastonia,
Greenville, Hickory, Kannapolis, Kings Mountain, Locust, Lowell, Marion,
Mount Airy, Mount Holly, New Bern, Newton, Oxford, Randleman, Roanoke
Rapids, Rockingham, Saluda, Sanford, Salisbury, Shelby, Southport,
Statesville, and Washington and the Towns of Ahoskie, Angier, Apex, Ayden,
Belville, Benson, Bladenboro, Bridgeton, Bunn, Burgaw, Calabash, Carthage,
Catawba, China Grove, Clayton, Columbia, Columbus, Cramerton, Creswell,
Dallas, Dobson, Four Oaks, Franklin, Franklinton, Franklinville,
Fuquay-Varina, Garner, Godwin, Goldston, Granite Quarry, Green Level,
Grimesland, Harrisburg, Holly Ridge, Holly Springs, Hookerton, Hope Mills,
Huntersville, Jamestown, Kenansville, Kenly, Knightdale, Landis, Laurel
Park, Liberty, Lillington, Louisburg, Madison, Maggie Valley, Maiden,
Mayodan, Maysville, Middlesex, Midland, Mocksville, Morrisville, Mount
Pleasant, Nashville, North Wilkesboro, Norwood, Oak Island, Oakboro,
Ocean Isle Beach, Pembroke, Pine Level, Pollocksville, Princeton, Ramseur,
Ranlo, Richlands, Rockwell, Rolesville, Rutherfordton, Shallotte, Siler City,
Smithfield, Spencer, Spring Lake, Stanley, Stem, Stovall, Surf City,
Swansboro, Taylorsville, Troutman, Troy, Vass, Wallace, Warsaw, Watha,
Waynesville, Weldon, Wendell, West Jefferson, Wilson's Mills, Windsor,
Wingate, Yadkinville, Youngsville, and Zebulon."
PART II. TOWN OF ANDREWS DEANNEXATION
SECTION 2.(a) The following described property is removed from the corporate
limits of the Town of Andrews:
TRACT I:
Parcel No. 556617114476000, being approximately 41 acres and more particularly described
in that certain deed from Douglas Cole and Mildred Alice Cole, husband and wife, to Douglas
*H26-v-5*

Cole, Trustee of the Douglas Cole Family Trust, dated November 13, 1992, and recorded in Deed
Book 666, Page 75, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT II:
Parcel No. 556617213361000, being approximately 10.75 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 266, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT III:
Parcel No. 556618219676000, being approximately 2.99 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 260, of the Cherokee County Registry.
TRACT IV:
Parcel No. 556617202977000, being approximately 7.26 acres and more particularly
described in that certain deed from Andrew S. Pyle and wife, Kelly K. Pyle, to Steelhouse
Mountain, LLC, a North Carolina limited liability company, dated September 9, 2018, and
recorded in Deed Book 1596, Page 262, of the Cherokee County Registry.
SECTION 2.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town
of Andrews for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this section
as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Andrews.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
PART III. CITY OF ELIZABETH CITY DEANNEXATION
SECTION 3.(a) The following described property is removed from the corporate
limits of the City of Elizabeth City:
All that certain lot or parcel of land situated in Mount Hermon Township, Pasquotank County,
North Carolina, and more particularly described as follows: Being Lot No. 1, containing 6.89
acres, as shown and delineated on that map or plat entitled in part, "Minor Subdivision for Storage
to Go, LLC", dated 04/16/2021, prepared by Timmons Group, and recorded in Map Book 73,
Page 23, of the Pasquotank County Registry.
SECTION 3.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City
of Elizabeth City for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective
date of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this
section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Elizabeth City.
SECTION 3.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
PART IV. CITY OF KING DEANNEXATION
SECTION 4.(a) The following described property is removed from the corporate
limits of the City of King:
TRACTS I AND II
Parcels identified by Stokes County Tax Property Identification Numbers 6901279265 and
6901371165.
TRACT III
All of the portion of Century Oak Drive Right of Way lying South of a new line crossing
from the most Southeasterly corner of Stokes County Tax Property Identification Number
6901370748 to the most Southwesterly corner of Stokes County Tax Property Identification
Page 2 Session Law 2025-14 House Bill 26

Number 6901372761 as Century Oak Drive Right of Way appears in the Stokes County Tax
Property GIS System.
SECTION 4.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City
of King for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of this
section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this section as
though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of King.
SECTION 4.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
PART V. TOWN OF DAVIDSON CHARTER CONSOLIDATION
SECTION 5.(a) The Charter of the Town of Davidson is revised and consolidated
to read:
"THE CHARTER OF THE TOWN OF DAVIDSON.
"ARTICLE I. INCORPORATION AND CORPORATE POWERS.
"Section 1.1. Incorporation. The Town of Davidson, in Iredell County and Mecklenburg
County, North Carolina, and the inhabitants thereof, shall continue to be a municipal body politic
and corporate under the name of the "Town of Davidson," hereinafter referred to as the "Town."
"Section 1.2. Grant and Exercise of Powers. (a) General Powers. The Town shall
continue to be vested with all of the property and rights in property belonging to the Town; shall
have perpetual succession; may sue and be sued; may contract and be contracted with; may
acquire and hold any property, real and personal, devised, bequeathed, sold, or in any manner
conveyed, dedicated, or otherwise acquired by them; and, from time to time, may hold, invest,
sell, or dispose of the same; may have a common seal, and alter and renew the same at will. The
enumeration of any particular powers, rights, or authorities shall not be held or deemed to be
exclusive. In addition to any powers, rights, or authorities enumerated or implied under this
Charter, the Town shall have and may exercise all of the powers, functions, duties, rights,
privileges, and immunities of every kind and nature whatsoever conferred upon the Town under
the general laws of the State of North Carolina, local acts applicable to the Town, and this
Charter.
(b) Manner of Exercise. All powers of the Town, whether expressed or implied, shall be
exercised in the manner prescribed by the general laws of the State of North Carolina, local acts
applicable to the Town, and this Charter or, if not prescribed therein, in the manner provided by
ordinance, resolution, or other official act of the Town's governing body.
"ARTICLE II. CORPORATE BOUNDARIES.
"Section 2.1. Corporate Boundaries. The corporate boundaries of the Town shall be those
existing on the effective date of this Charter, as the same may be modified and updated from time
to time. The official corporate limits shall be set forth and delineated either on the official map
of the Town corporate limits, by a written narrative description of the corporate limits, or through
a combination of such techniques. Such official description of the corporate limits shall be kept
and retained permanently in the office of the Town Clerk. Modifications to the official corporate
limits shall be indicated by appropriate entries upon, or additions to, the map or description, made
by or under the direction of the Town Clerk, in the manner prescribed by law. Upon alteration of
the corporate limits pursuant to law, the appropriate changes to the official map shall be made,
and copies shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, the Iredell County Register of
Deeds, the Mecklenburg County Register of Deeds, the Iredell County Board of Elections, and
the Mecklenburg County Board of Elections.
"ARTICLE III. GOVERNING BODY.
"Section 3.1. Mayor and Board; Powers. The Board of Commissioners (hereinafter
"Board") and the Mayor shall be the governing body of the Town. The Board shall consist of five
House Bill 26 Session Law 2025-14 Page 3

members and the Mayor, each to be elected at large by the qualified voters of the Town. All
powers of the Town shall be vested in and exercised by the Mayor and the Board.
"Section 3.2. Terms of Mayor and Board. The Mayor shall be elected to serve for a
two-year term. Each Board member shall serve a four-year term, and the terms shall be staggered.
The Mayor and Board members shall continue to serve until their successors are chosen and
qualified.
"Section 3.3. Duties of the Mayor; Mayor Pro Tempore. (a) The Mayor shall preside at
all meetings of the Board; shall have a casting vote only in case of an equal division; shall be
recognized as the official head of the Town for all ceremonial purposes; shall have the power to
administer oaths; shall execute all official instruments and documents of the Town, unless that
authority has been delegated to another official of the Town by the general laws of North Carolina
or a Town ordinance; and shall exercise such other powers and perform such other duties as are
or may be conferred and imposed upon the office of Mayor by the general laws of North Carolina,
this Charter, or the ordinances of the Town, not inconsistent therewith.
(b) At its first regular meeting following the regular municipal elections held as provided
in Article IV of this Charter, the Board shall choose one of its members to serve as Mayor Pro
Tempore. A Board member serving as Mayor Pro Tempore shall be entitled to vote on all matters
and shall be considered a Board member for all purposes, including whether a quorum is present.
"Section 3.4. Residency Qualification; Compensation. (a) No person shall be eligible
to file for or be elected to the office of Mayor or Board, or to serve as such, unless he or she is a
qualified voter and resident of the Town.
(b) In accordance with general law, the Board may provide for and fix the amount of
compensation for Council members and the Mayor.
"Section 3.5. Meetings; Procedure; Adoption of Ordinances; Organizational Meeting;
Oaths. (a) The organizational meeting of the Board shall be held at the time of the first regular
meeting of the Board following each regular municipal election. At the organizational meeting,
or otherwise before entering upon the duties of their respective offices, the Mayor-elect and
each Board member-elect shall take an oath prescribed by law before a person authorized by
law to administer oaths.
(b) The Board shall fix suitable times for its regular meetings, which shall be at least once
each month. The Board may change the time of the regular meetings as it deems necessary.
Special meetings of the Board may be held in accordance with applicable general law regarding
(i) the authority for special meetings, (ii) procedures for calling, (iii) notice of such meetings, and
(iv) conditions upon matters to be addressed at special meetings. Minutes shall be kept of the
proceedings of all regular and special meetings. Subject to applicable provisions of Article 33C
of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes, the Open Meetings Law of North Carolina, all meetings
of the Board shall be open to the public. The Board shall have the authority to adopt rules of
procedure not inconsistent with applicable general law, provisions of this Charter, or generally
accepted principles of parliamentary procedure.
(c) The Board may adopt and provide for the execution of such ordinances, resolutions,
rules, and regulations, not inconsistent with general law, local acts applicable to the Town, or the
provisions of this Charter, as may be necessary or appropriate for the preservation and promotion
of the health, safety, and welfare of the Town and its inhabitants.
"Section 3.6. Quorum and Voting Requirements. In the transaction of Board business, the
presence of a quorum, whether a Board member may be excused from voting on any matter, and
other voting rules and requirements shall be determined in accordance with applicable provisions
of general law.
"Section 3.7. Vacancies. A vacancy in the office of Mayor or Board shall be filled as
provided in G.S. 160A-63.
"ARTICLE IV. ELECTIONS.
"Chapter 1. Municipal Elections.
Page 4 Session Law 2025-14 House Bill 26

"Section 4.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held in
each odd-numbered year in accordance with the uniform municipal election laws of North
Carolina in Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. Elections shall be conducted on a nonpartisan
basis and the results determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided in
G.S. 163-292.
"Section 4.2. Special Elections; Referenda. Special elections and referenda may be held
only as provided by general law or local acts applicable to the Town.
"Section 4.3. Election of Mayor. A Mayor shall be elected every two years and shall serve
a two-year term.
"Section 4.4. Election of Board. The Board shall be comprised of five members elected to
serve four-year staggered terms until their successors are elected and qualified.
"ARTICLE V. ORGANIZATION AND ADMINISTRATION.
"Section 5.1. Form of Government. The Town shall operate under the council-manager
form of government in accordance with Part 2 of Article 7 of Chapter 160A of the General
Statutes.
"Section 5.2. Town Manager. The Board shall appoint a Town Manager to serve at its
pleasure who shall be the chief administrative official of Town government and who shall be
responsible to the Board for the proper administration of the affairs of the Town. The Town
Manager shall have those powers and duties provided by general law and shall also perform such
other duties as are prescribed by the Board, subject to general law. The Town Manager shall
appoint and may remove all Town employees except the Town Attorney.
"Section 5.3. Town Attorney; Appointment and Duties. The Board shall appoint one or
more persons to serve as Town Attorney. The Town Attorney shall serve at the pleasure of the
Board and shall be its legal adviser. The Town Attorney shall also serve as legal counsel to the
Town and its departments and offices. As directed by the Board, the Town Attorney shall
represent the Town in all litigation and legal proceedings before courts of law, administrative
boards and commissions, and other legal tribunals. The Town Attorney shall perform such
other duties of a legal nature pertaining to the Town as may be directed by the Board or as may
be imposed by law upon the Town Attorney. The Board may engage other attorneys to provide
legal services for the Town as it deems advisable.
"Section 5.4. Clerk; Duties. The Board shall appoint a Town Clerk to give notice of
meetings of the Board; to make and maintain full and accurate minutes of the proceedings of the
Board; to be the custodian of all books, records, documents, and other Town records; and to
surrender the same to his or her successor in office. The Town Clerk shall be the custodian of the
official seal of the Town and shall affix the official seal to, and attest on behalf of the Town the
execution of, all deeds, contracts, and other official documents, all in accordance with applicable
laws and ordinances. The Town Clerk shall perform such other duties as provided by general law
and as directed by the Board.
"Section 5.5. Administrative Head Appointments; Other Appointments. The Town
Manager may appoint other administration and department heads as permitted by Part 2 of Article
7 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, including assignment of administrative duties to the
Town Clerk. The Town Manager may also authorize other positions to be filled by appointment
and organize the Town governance as deemed appropriate subject to requirements of general
law."
SECTION 5.(b) In 2025 for the regular municipal election, in order to implement
the staggering for terms of office for the Board, the two persons receiving the two highest
numbers of votes shall serve four-year terms and the three persons receiving the next three
highest numbers of votes shall serve two-year terms. In 2027, and quadrennially thereafter, three
members of the Board shall be elected for four-year terms. In 2029, and quadrennially thereafter,
two members of the Board shall be elected for four-year terms.
House Bill 26 Session Law 2025-14 Page 5

SECTION 5.(c) The purpose of this section is to revise the Charter of the Town of
Davidson and to consolidate certain acts concerning the property, affairs, and government of the
Town. It is intended to continue without interruption those provisions of prior acts that are
expressly consolidated into this section, so that all rights and liabilities which have accrued are
preserved and may be enforced.
SECTION 5.(d) This section does not repeal or affect any acts concerning the
property, affairs, or government of public schools or any acts validating official actions,
proceedings, contracts, or obligations of any kind.
SECTION 5.(e) The following acts, having served the purposes for which they were
enacted or having been consolidated into this section, are expressly repealed:
(1) Chapter 281 of the Private Laws of 1891.
(2) Chapter 106 of the Private Laws of 1935.
(3) Chapter 36 of the Session Laws of 1957.
SECTION 5.(f) The provisions of this section shall have no effect on the validity of
the following acts as they apply to the Town of Davidson:
(1) Chapter 411 of the Session Laws of 1993.
(2) S.L. 1997-420.
(3) S.L. 1999-85.
SECTION 5.(g) This section does not affect any rights or interests that arose under
any provisions repealed by this section.
SECTION 5.(h) All existing ordinances, resolutions, and other provisions of the
Town of Davidson not inconsistent with the provisions of this section shall continue in effect
until repealed or amended.
SECTION 5.(i) Whenever a reference is made in this section to a particular provision
of the General Statutes and the provision is later amended, superseded, or recodified, the
reference shall be deemed amended to refer to the amended General Statute or to the General
Statute that most clearly corresponds to the statutory provision that is superseded or recodified.
SECTION 5.(j) If any provision of this section or application thereof is held invalid,
such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given
effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the provisions of this section
are declared to be severable.
SECTION 5.(k) This section is effective when it becomes law. No action or
proceeding pending on the effective date of this section by or against the Town of Davidson or
any of its departments or agencies shall be abated or otherwise affected by this section.
PART VI. TOWN OF FOUR OAKS DEANNEXATION
SECTION 6.(a) The following described property is removed from the corporate
limits of the Town of Four Oaks:
TRACT I:
Being all of Area 1, containing 11.609 acres, more or less, as shown on that map entitled
"Estate Division by Will Plat for Bill Ray Price Estate" recorded in Map Book 95, Page 204 of
the Johnston County Registry.
TRACT II:
Being all of that certain tract or parcel of land described as "Remaining Combined Area,"
containing 14.432 acres, more or less, as shown on that map entitled "Minor Subdivision Plat for
Pamela Rae Price" recorded in Map Book 96, Page 278 of the Johnston County Registry.
SECTION 6.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the Town
of Four Oaks for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this
section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the Town of Four Oaks.
Page 6 Session Law 2025-14 House Bill 26

SECTION 6.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
PART VII. CITY OF CREEDMOOR DEANNEXATION
SECTION 7.(a) The following described property, identified by Granville County
Tax Property Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the City of
Creedmoor: 180603417847.
SECTION 7.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City
of Creedmoor for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this
section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Creedmoor.
SECTION 7.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
PART VIII. CITY OF WILSON DEANNEXATION
SECTION 8.(a) The following described property is removed from the corporate
limits of the City of Wilson:
BEGINNING at a point at the intersection of the northerly right-of-way of Lake Wilson Road
(S.R. 1332) with the easterly right-of-way of London Church Road (S.R. 1327), thence from said
point of BEGINNING running along the northerly right-of-way of Lake Wilson Road North 72
degrees 17 minutes 06 seconds East 204.21 feet and North 71 degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds
East 232.02 feet to an iron stake, cornering, thence leaving the northerly right-of-way of Lake
Wilson Road North 18 degrees 29 minutes 50 seconds West 522.41 feet to an iron stake,
cornering, thence North 73 degrees 20 minutes 31 seconds East 157.58 feet to an iron stake,
cornering, thence South 1 degrees 29 minutes 50 seconds East 577.35 feet to a point on the
southerly right-of-way of Lake Wilson Road, cornering, thence running along the southerly
right-of-way of Lake Wilson Road South 71 degrees 30 minutes 10 seconds West 389.52 feet
and South 72 degrees 17 minutes 06 seconds West 206.90 feet to a point located at the
intersection of the southerly right-of-way of Lake Wilson Road with the easterly right-of-way of
London Church Road, cornering, thence running North 15 degrees 55 minutes 30 seconds West
60.06 feet to the point of BEGINNING and containing 2.70 acres.
SECTION 8.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City
of Wilson for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date of
this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this section
as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Wilson.
SECTION 8.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in this section as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
House Bill 26 Session Law 2025-14 Page 7

PART IX. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 9. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 25th day of June, 2025.
s/ Rachel Hunt
President of the Senate
s/ Destin Hall
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Page 8 Session Law 2025-14 House Bill 26